District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2102

License required; application; fee; bond; records; penalty.

Repealed.

Sept. 1, 1959, 73 Stat. 449, Pub. L. 86-219, § 2
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 107, 23 DCR 2461
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(1), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2102.
1973 Ed., § 47-3002.